Arkansas, session 2025, SB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-423(c)(3), concerning the meetings of
the Public School Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission, is amended to
read as follows:
(3) The commission shall meet monthly quarterly and have a
minimum of twelve (12) four (4) meetings annually.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-423(d), concerning the stipend for
appointed members of the Public School Employee Health Benefit Advisory
*ANS160*
01/28/2025 11:16:39 AM ANS160

SB134
Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Each appointed member who is not an active employee shall be paid
a stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) one hundred dollars ($100) per month
plus mileage.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 21-5-424(c)(3), concerning the meetings of
the State Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) The commission shall meet monthly quarterly and have a
minimum of twelve (12) four (4) meetings annually.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 21-5-424(d), concerning the stipend for
appointed members of the State Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission,
is amended to read as follows:
(d) Each appointed member who is not an active employee shall be paid
a stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) one hundred dollars ($100) per month
plus mileage.



















01/28/2025 11:16:39 AM ANS160